District of Columbia statutes.
7-502.01

Definitions.

(1)

“Office” means the Office on Aging created by § 7-503.01.

(2)

“Director” means the Executive Director of the Office on Aging.

(3)

“Commission” means the Commission on the Aging created by § 7-504.01.

(4)

“Aged” means a person 60 years of age or older.

(5)

“Services to the aged” means those services designed to provide assistance to the aged, including nutritional programs, transportation and legal services, health and financial assistance, employment and housing programs, recreational opportunities, and information, referral, and counseling services.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title II, § 201, 22 DCR 2456
1981 Ed., § 6-2202.
1973 Ed., § 6-1702.